Utah statutes.
10-2-606.   Public hearings.
The governing body of each municipality in its plan for consolidation shall
set a time and place for a public hearing or public hearings which shall be
held at least ten days after the plan of consolidation and the dates of the
public hearing have been submitted to the county legislative bodies. The
public hearing may be held jointly or separately by the governing bodies of
each municipality to be consolidated. Any interested person may be heard on
any aspect of the proposed consolidation. One or more certified copies of the
plan of consolidation shall be available in the recorder's office of each
municipality at least five days prior to the hearing.
